Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.145, is amended to read: 326B.145 ANNUAL REPORT. new text begin (a) new text end Each municipality shall annually report by June 30 to the department, in a format prescribed by the department, all construction and development-related fees collected by the municipality from developers, builders, and subcontractors if the cumulative fees collected exceeded deleted text begin $5,000deleted text end new text begin $7,000new text end in the reporting year, except that, for reports due June 30, 2009, to June 30, 2013, the reporting threshold is $10,000. new text begin (b)new text end The report must include: (1) the number and valuation of units for which fees were paid; (2) the amount of building permit fees, plan review fees, administrative fees, engineering fees, infrastructure fees, and other construction and development-related fees; and (3) the expenses associated with the municipal activities for which fees were collected. new text begin (c) new text end A municipality that fails to report to the department in accordance with this section is subject to the remedies provided by section 326B.082. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.153, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Valuation. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall establish a cost per square foot valuation of new one-family and two-family, townhouse, and accessory utility buildings for the purpose of setting building permit fees by municipalities. new text end